Missouri, session 2026, SB1364.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 167.795, to read as
follows:
167.795. 1. For purposes of this section, "activities
association" shall mean any nonprofit statewide organization
that facilitates interscholastic activities for secondary
school students, and whose members include at least one
public school district that pays any fees to such
association, including, but not limited to, activity
participation fees, tournament registration fees, membership
fees, or any other fees relating to membership in such
association or participation in any activities facilitated
by such association.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, an activities association shall be overseen by a
board of directors appointed by the governor, by and with
the advice and consent of the senate.
3. The board of directors shall consist of three
members. The term of office of each member shall be four
years. At the expiration of the term of each member, the

SB 1364 2
governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate,
shall appoint a successor. If the general assembly is not
in session at the time for making an appointment, the
governor shall make a temporary appointment as in the case
of a vacancy.
4. The board of directors shall have ultimate
authority over, and final decision-making power with respect
to, all actions of an activities association. Upon motion
of any party, a matter may be transferred directly to the
board at any time during such matter's pendency.
5. The board of directors shall have authority to
remove any employee or member of an activities association,
with or without cause, at such time and in such manner as
the board shall deem proper.
Section B. Due to the physical and mental health
challenges faced by minors in the state of Missouri who have
been adversely impacted by the actions of activities
associations, section A of this act is deemed necessary for
the immediate preservation of the public health, welfare,
peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency
act within the meaning of the constitution, and section A of
this act shall be in full force and effect upon its passage
and approval.
✓